Massachusetts, session 194th, H4123.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 126 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 41. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Department”, the department of correction established by section 1 of chapter 27.
“Opioid antagonist”, naloxone or any other drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration as a competitive narcotic antagonist used in the reversal of overdoses caused by
opioids.
“Pharmacist”, any pharmacist registered in the commonwealth to dispense controlled
substances, and including any other person authorized to dispense controlled substances under
the supervision of a pharmacist registered in the commonwealth.
of 2

(b) Any correctional facility, county correctional facility, state prison, jail or house of
correction in the commonwealth shall have a department approved pharmacist or designee
distribute 2 doses of opioid antagonists to an incarcerated individual when they are directly
released from a correctional facility, county correctional facility, state prison, jail or house of
correction.
of 2